Nevada, session 83, SB481.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services the sum of $1,647,791
for an unanticipated shortfall related to the costs of provider services
in the Southern Nevada Adult Mental Health Services budget
account. This appropriation is supplemental to that made by section
17 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1239.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)